Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-254
Mortgage; record; certificate of discharge or satisfaction; how indexed.

Every such certificate and the proof or the acknowledgment thereof shall be indexed in the order of mortgages and recorded at full length. In the record of discharge the register of deeds shall make a reference to the book and page or computer system reference where the mortgage is recorded.

R.S.1866, c. 43, § 33, p. 287;

Laws 1887, c. 30, § 23, p. 271;

R.S.1913, § 6226;

C.S.1922, § 5625;

C.S.1929, § 76-231;

R.S.1943, § 76-254;

Laws 1984, LB 679, § 14.

Real estate mortgages must be indexed and recorded at full length, and abstract showing release of mortgage in index but not of record, does not show good title of record. Rath v. Wilgus, 110 Neb. 810, 195 N.W. 115 (1923).